Utah statutes.
49-18-403.   Annual cost-of-living adjustment.
(1)  The office shall make an annual cost-of-living adjustment to:
(a)  an allowance paid under Section 49-18-402 and Part 5, Death Benefit, of
this chapter if the benefit has been paid for at least one year; and
(b)  a payment made to an alternate payee under a domestic relations order, if
the payment is to be paid as a percentage of the allowance rather than a
specific dollar amount.
(2) (a)  The allowance shall be increased by the annual increase in the
Consumer Price Index up to a maximum of 4%.
(b)  Annual increases in the Consumer Price Index in excess of 4% shall be
accumulated and used in subsequent adjustments when the increase in the
Consumer Price Index is less than 4%.
(3)  The Consumer Price Index used in calculating adjustments shall be a
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index average as
determined by the board.
(4)  The cost-of-living adjustment made under this section may not decrease
the allowance.
